Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 4. Testimony and Witnesses

Cross references. —

As to depositions generally, see Rule 15, W.R. Cr. P.

As to taking of testimony, see Rule 26, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

23 Am. Jur. 2d Depositions and Discovery § 1 et seq.; 29 Am. Jur. 2d Evidence § 1 et seq.; 81 Am. Jur. 2d Witnesses § 1 et seq.

Admissibility in criminal case, on issue of defendant's guilt, of evidence that third person has attempted to influence a witness not to testify or to testify falsely, 79 ALR3d 1156.

Right of indigent criminal defendant to polygraph test at public expense, 11 ALR4th 733.

Court's witnesses (other than expert) in state criminal prosecution, 16 ALR4th 352.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of witness testifying while in prison attire, 16 ALR4th 1356.

Appealability of state criminal court order requiring witness other than accused to undergo psychiatric examination, 17 ALR4th 867.

Impeachment of defendant in criminal case by showing defendant's prearrest silence — state cases, 35 ALR4th 731.

Closed-circuit television witness examination, 61 ALR4th 1155.

Adverse presumption or inference based on failure to produce or examine codefendant or accomplice who is not on trial—modern criminal cases, 76 ALR4th 812.

Admissibility of hypnotically refreshed or enhanced testimony, 77 ALR4th 927.

Adverse presumption or inference based on party's failure to produce or examine that party's attorney—modern cases, 78 ALR4th 571.

Adverse presumption or inference based on party's failure to produce or examine witness who was occupant of vehicle involved in accident—modern cases, 78 ALR4th 616.

Adverse presumption or inference based on state's failure to produce or examine law enforcement personnel — modern cases, 81 ALR4th 872.

Adverse presumption or inference based on party's failure to produce or examine transferor, transferee, broker or other person allegedly involved in transaction at issue — modern cases, 81 ALR4th 939.

Sufficiency of evidence that witness in criminal case was hypnotized, for purposes of determining admissibility of testimony given under hypnosis or of hypnotically enhanced testimony, 16 ALR5th 841.

22A C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 622 to 769.

§ 7-11-401.
Testimony of defendant.

The defendant in all criminal cases, in all the courts in this state, may be sworn and examined as a witness, if he so elects, but the defendant shall not be required to testify in any case unless he has been lawfully granted immunity from prosecution, penalty or forfeiture. The neglect or refusal of a defendant to testify without immunity having been granted shall not create any presumption against him, nor shall any reference be made to, nor shall any comment be made upon, his neglect or refusal to testify.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, §§ 128, 129; Laws 1877, p. 25, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1887, § 3288; R.S. 1899, § 5346; C.S. 1910, § 6210; C.S. 1920, § 7507; Laws 1925, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 33-801; C.S. 1945, § 10-1201; W.S. 1957, § 7-244; Laws 1971, ch. 94, § 1; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to privilege against self-incrimination, see art. 1, § 11, Wyo. Const.

Prosecutors have no authority to grant immunity. —

A prosecuting attorney (district attorney or county attorney) in Wyoming has no authority to grant immunity to a witness. Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Defendant's position as witness. —

Defendant in criminal action testifying in his own behalf occupies double position; as defendant, his character cannot be attacked by state, but as witness, he puts his credibility at issue like any other witness. State v. Velsir, 61 Wyo. 476, 159 P.2d 371,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1945).

Testimony that defendant refused to answer police violatesself-incrimination privilege. —

Where the state's witnesses' testified to the effect that the defendant had refused to respond when asked if he planned to sell the marijuana, reversible error was committed, since the prosecution elicited the testimony that defendant had remained silent during custodial interrogation, not to show that its own evidence stood uncontradicted, but to create the inference that an honest answer would have established the defendant's guilt. This was impermissible and violated the defendant's privilege against self-incrimination. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

Unless privilege has been knowingly waived. —

It is not the intent, purpose, sense or letter of the privilege against self-incrimination generally to say that the defendant's invocation of the privilege will result in a penalty being charged against his defense consisting of informing the jury that he has refused to talk with the officers during custodial interrogation. This is so unless the defendant has clearly and knowingly and with unmistakable understanding waived the privilege and has indicated that he knew that this was what he was doing and did it of his own free will. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

The burden of proof of voluntariness and waiver is on the state.

Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

When comment on failure to testify nonprejudicial. —

Comment upon the defendant's failure to testify at trial can be held to be nonprejudicial only where it can be shown beyond reasonable doubt to have been harmless and not to have contributed to a conviction. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

Testimony by jointly indicted codefendants. —

Where persons jointly indicted are tried separately, one of them may testify against the other. McGinness v. State, 4 Wyo. 115,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1893).

Instructions. —

Under this section it was not error to refuse to charge that defendant was not required to testify, and that jury could not presume anything against him because of such failure. Leslie v. State, 10 Wyo. 10, 65 P. 849,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1901), reh'g denied, 10 Wyo. 10, 69 P. 2,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1902).

In view of this section, the prosecuting attorney might inquire as to the source of an instruction, that neglect or refusal of defendant to make a statement should not create any presumption against him, since it might be anticipated that it would be alleged as error unless coming from the defendant or his counsel. State v. Bemis, 34 Wyo. 218, 242 P. 802,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1926).

Denial of instruction that defendant's failure to testify created no presumption against him was not error. Kinney v. State, 36 Wyo. 466, 256 P. 1040,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1927).

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Codefendant's counsel commenting on accused's failure to testify, 1 ALR3d 989.

Comment or argument by court or counsel that prosecution evidence is uncontradicted as amounting to improper reference to accused's failure to testify, 14 ALR3d 723.

Whether violation of federal constitutional rule (Griffin v. California) prohibiting adverse comment by prosecutor or court on accused's failure to testify constitutes reversible or harmless error, 24 ALR3d 1093, 32 ALR4th 774.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecutor's argument commenting on failure of defendant's spouse to testify, 26 ALR4th 9.

Enforceability of agreement by law enforcement officials not to prosecute if accused would help in criminal investigation or would become witness against others, 32 ALR4th 990.

Propriety, under state constitutional provisions, of granting use or transactional immunity for compelling incriminating testimony—post-Kastigar cases, 29 ALR5th 1.

Coercive conduct by private person as affecting admissibility of confession under state statutes or constitutional provisions — post-Connelly cases, 48 ALR5th 555.

Requirement that court advise accused of, and make inquiry with respect to, waiver of right to testify, 72 ALR5th 403.

Effect of defendant's immunized statements on testimony by prosecution witness—post-Kastigar cases, 122 ALR Fed 429.

§ 7-11-402.
Subpoena of witnesses for indigent defendants.

Upon application of a defendant and upon a satisfactory showing that the defendant is financially unable to pay the fees of a witness and that the presence of the witness is necessary to an adequate defense, the court shall order that a subpoena be issued for service on a named witness and order that all fees and costs incurred be paid as provided by subsection (b) of this section.

If the court orders a subpoena to be issued under this section, the costs incurred and the fees of the witness so subpoenaed shall be paid by the public defender’s office.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 130; Laws 1879, ch. 27, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3289; R.S. 1899, § 5347; C.S. 1910, § 6211; C.S. 1920, § 7508; R.S. 1931, § 33-802; C.S. 1945, § 10-1202; W.S. 1957, § 7-245; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1991, ch. 142, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to payment of fees, see §

1-14-106

.

As to witnesses demanded at one time in civil and criminal cases to be named in one writ, see §

1-14-109

.

As to procedure regarding subpoenas, see Rule 17, W.R. Cr. P.

Right to compulsory process. —

In defendant's felony murder case, defendant's right to summon witnesses in his defense was not violated because all witnesses who defendant wanted to call were summoned. Even the many witnesses for whom defendant could not provide a street/delivery address were sought and served, if possible; the district court did not abuse its discretion in any way with respect to requiring the issuance of subpoenas on defendant's behalf. Lemus v. State, 2007 WY 111, 162 P.3d 497,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2007).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — An Indigent's Right to a Free Trial Transcript. Mayer v. City of Chicago, 404 U.S. 189, 30 L. Ed. 2d 372, 92 S. Ct. 410, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 298 (1971),” See VII Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to limit number of witnesses, 5 ALR3d 169, 5 ALR3d 238.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of ballistics experts, 71 ALR4th 638.

§ 7-11-403.
Applicability of rules and civil procedure provisions.

To the extent practicable and when not otherwise specifically provided, the provisions of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, the Wyoming Rules of Evidence and the Wyoming Code of Civil Procedure shall govern in criminal cases, relative to:

Compelling the attendance and testimony of witnesses;

The examination of witnesses and the administering of oaths and affirmations;

Proceedings for contempt; and

Proceedings to enforce the remedies and protect the rights of parties.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 132; R.S. 1887, § 3292; R.S. 1899, § 5350; C.S. 1910, § 6214; C.S. 1920, § 7511; R.S. 1931, § 33-805; C.S. 1945, § 10-1206; W.S. 1957, § 7-249; W.S. 1977, §

7-11-406

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to evidence and witnesses generally, see chapter 12 of title 1 and Rules 601 through 615, W.R.E.

As to procedure regarding subpoenas, see Rule 17, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), inserted “Wyoming” preceding “Code of Civil Procedure.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

For article, “A Comprehensive Treatise on Contempt of Court in Wyoming,” see
15 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

§ 7-11-404.
Summoning of person within this state to appear as witness in another state.

If a judge of a court of record in any state which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within that state to attend and testify in criminal prosecutions in this state certifies under the seal of the court that there is a criminal prosecution pending in such court, that a person being within this state is a material witness in the prosecution, and that his presence will be required for a specified number of days, upon presentation of the certificate to any judge of a court of record in the county in which such person is, the judge shall fix a time and place for hearing and shall notify the witness of the time and place.

If at the hearing the judge determines that the witness is material and necessary, that it will not cause undue hardship to the witness to be compelled to attend and testify in the prosecution in the other state and that the laws of the state in which the prosecution is pending and of any other state through which the witness may be required to pass by ordinary course of travel will give to him protection from arrest and the service of civil and criminal process, he shall issue a summons with a copy of the certificate attached, directing the witness to attend and testify in the court where the prosecution is pending at a time and place specified in the summons.

A witness who is summoned to attend and testify in a criminal prosecution in another state as provided by this section, shall not be compelled to attend unless he is paid or tendered by some properly authorized person compensation including mileage for each mile traveled by the ordinary route to and from the court where the prosecution is pending and witness fees for each day that he is required to travel and attend as a witness. The mileage and witness fees shall be at the same rate paid other witnesses under the laws of the state requiring attendance. A witness who has been paid or tendered the compensation required by this subsection and who fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the summons, shall be punished in a manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a summons issued from a court of record in this state.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 120, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 10-1207; W.S. 1957, § 7-250; W.S. 1977, §

7-11-407

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to failure of witness to obey subpoena, see §

1-12-107

.

Motion to dismiss.

Because it
was unclear whether the State acted in good faith in moving to dismiss,
the district court was directed to conduct proceedings to determine
whether the State acted in bad faith in seeking dismissal; to obtain
an order from a judge in another state, the State would have had
to
provide a date and time certain on which the witness had to report
and testify, and the shifting trial dates were a product of the complex
and crowded docket but made the trial date difficult. State v. Bridger,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. June 17, 2014).

Applied

in

Caton v. State, 709 P.2d 1260,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Uniform Act to Secure Attendance of Witnesses from Without a State in Criminal Proceedings, 44 ALR2d 732, 7 ALR4th 836, 12 ALR4th 742, 12 ALR4th 771.

Sufficiency of evidence to support or require finding that in-state witness in criminal case is “material and necessary,” justifying issuance of summons directing attendance of witness under Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from Without a State in Criminal Proceedings, 12 ALR4th 771.

§ 7-11-405.
Summoning of person in another state to appear as witness in this state.

If a person in any state, which by its laws has made provisions for commanding persons within its borders to attend and testify in criminal prosecutions in this state, is a material witness in a prosecution pending in a court of record in this state, a judge of the Wyoming court may issue a certificate under the seal of the court stating these facts and specifying the number of days the witness will be required. This certificate shall be presented to a judge of a court of record in the county in which the witness is found.

If the witness is summoned to attend and testify in the criminal prosecution in this state, he shall be paid or tendered payment for mileage for each mile traveled by the ordinary route to and from the court where the prosecution is pending and witness fees for each day that he is required to travel and attend as a witness at the same rate paid other witnesses under the laws of this state. A witness who has appeared in accordance with the provisions of the summons shall not be required to remain within this state a longer period of time than the period mentioned in the certificate of the Wyoming court.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 120, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 10-1208; W.S. 1957, § 7-251; W.S. 1977, §

7-11-408

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to witness fees, see §

1-14-102

.

Right to compulsory process. —

In defendant's felony murder case, defendant's right to summon witnesses in his defense was not violated because all witnesses who defendant wanted to call were summoned. Even the many witnesses for whom defendant could not provide a street/delivery address were sought and served, if possible; the district court did not abuse its discretion in any way with respect to requiring the issuance of subpoenas on defendant's behalf. Lemus v. State, 2007 WY 111, 162 P.3d 497,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2007).

Motion to dismiss.

Because it
was unclear whether the State acted in good faith in moving to dismiss,
the district court was directed to conduct proceedings to determine
whether the State acted in bad faith in seeking dismissal; to obtain
an order from a judge in another state, the State would have had
to
provide a date and time certain on which the witness had to report
and testify, and the shifting trial dates were a product of the complex
and crowded docket but made the trial date difficult. State v. Bridger,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. June 17, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of evidence to support or require finding that out-of-state witness in criminal case is “material witness” justifying certificate to secure attendance under Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from Without a State in Criminal Proceedings, 12 ALR4th 742.

§ 7-11-406.
Exemption of out-of-state witness from arrest or service of process.

If a person comes into this state pursuant to a summons directing him to attend and testify in a criminal prosecution in this state he shall not while in this state pursuant to the summons be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons.

If a person passes through this state while going to another state pursuant to a summons to attend and testify in a criminal prosecution in that state or while returning therefrom, he shall not while so passing through this state be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 120, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 10-1209; W.S. 1957, § 7-252; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-409; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

§ 7-11-407.
Procedures for taking depositions.

Procedures for the taking of depositions in criminal cases shall be governed by the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 96, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 5351; C.S. 1910, § 6215; C.S. 1920, § 7512; R.S. 1931, § 33-806; C.S. 1945, § 10-1210; W.S. 1957, § 7-253; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-410; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to deposition procedure, see Rule 15, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, deleted “and the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure for County Courts” at the end of the paragraph.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, also deleted “and the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure for County Courts” at the end of the paragraph.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

See the conflicting legislation note below. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both 2004 acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Use, in federal criminal prosecution, of deposition of absent witness taken in foreign country, as affected by Federal Rule of Criminal Procedure 15(b) and (d) requiring presence of accused and that deposition be taken in manner provided in civil actions, 105 ALR Fed 537.

§ 7-11-408.
Videotape depositions.

In any case in which the defendant is charged with incest as defined in W.S. 6-4-402(a) or sexual assault as defined in W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

and

6-2-314

through

6-2-317

and a child less than twelve (12) years of age is the victim, the judge may order the taking of a videotape deposition of the child. The videotaping shall be done under the supervision of the court.

Persons allowed to be present at the videotaping of the deposition are the child, the judge, prosecutor, defendant and defense counsel, a family member who was not a witness to the offense or a support person for the child and any technicians required to operate the equipment.

Before ordering the deposition, the judge shall find that:

The child’s testimony would be relevant and material;

The best interests of the child would be served by permitting the videotape deposition;

A potential physical or psychological harm to the child is likely to occur if the child is required to testify which would effectively render the child incapable to testify at the trial; and

The defendant or his legal counsel has the opportunity to be present and to cross-examine the child at the videotape deposition.

The judge may deny the defendant’s face-to-face confrontation of the child at the videotape deposition if:

The defendant is alleged to have inflicted physical harm or is alleged to have threatened to inflict physical harm upon the child, and physical or psychological harm to the child is likely to occur if there is a face-to-face confrontation of the child by defendant;

The defendant’s legal counsel will have reasonable opportunity to confer with his client before and at any time during the videotape deposition; and

The defendant will have opportunity to view and hear the proceedings while being taken.

A videotape deposition may be admitted at trial in lieu of the direct testimony of the child, if the judge finds, after hearing, that:

The visual and sound qualities of the videotape are satisfactory;

The videotape is not misleading;

All portions of the videotape that have been ruled inadmissible have been deleted; and

A potential physical or psychological harm to the child is likely to occur if the child is required to testify which would effectively render the child incapable to testify at the trial.

Children unable to articulate what was done to them will be permitted to demonstrate the sexual act or acts committed against them with the aid of anatomically correct dolls. Such demonstrations will be under the supervision of the court and shall be videotaped to be viewed at trial, and shall be received into evidence as demonstrative evidence.

Videotapes which are part of the court record are subject to a protective order to preserve the privacy of the child.

If the prosecutor elects to utilize a videotaped deposition pursuant to this section and the videotape has been taken and is admissible, the child may not testify in court without the consent of the defendant.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 149, § 1; 2009, ch. 68, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to right of accused to confront witnesses, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “6-2-304 and

6-2-314

through

6-2-317

” for “6-2-305” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

W.S.

6-2-305

, referred to in this section, was repealed prospectively by Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 2. For present provisions, see §

6-2-304

.

Statute violated. —

Use of a video deposition of a child victim at defendant's trial for indecent liberties, as well as the seating arrangement at the deposition that obscured defendant's and victim's view of each other, violated defendant's right to confront witnesses against him as guaranteed by U.S. Const. amend. VI and the statutory requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-11-408

.
Bowser v. State, 2009 WY 54, 205 P.3d 1018,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2009).